New Jersey, session 222, S107.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any regulation of the Council on Affordable Housing to the contrary, the council shall not adopt as a part of its methodology in calculating the fair share obligation of any municipality pursuant to the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al), a requirement that affordable housing need is generated upon the move or transfer of any commercial or industrial entity from one location to another location within the same municipality, or within the same housing region, or upon a move or transfer of the entity within a 50 mile radius extending in all directions from the initial location of the entity. b.    A municipality shall not impose a fee for affordable housing purposes upon a developer meeting the criteria of subsection a. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.